North Dakota, session 69, SB2360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - GEOTHERMAL ENERGY.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the feasibility
of developing geothermal energy in the state. The study must include an evaluation of:
a. The state's geology and the feasibility of resource exploration and production of
geothermal energy in the state.
b. Support opportunities for startup geothermal companies, including fostering innovation
and promoting economic growth within the state's energy sector.
c. The application of geothermal energy to nonproductive oil and gas wells to extend the life
of the well through the use of a complementary energy extraction method.
d. Other opportunities to advance geothermal energy opportunities in the state.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2360 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2360.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 4 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State